Hawaii statutes.
[§132C-5] State fire council; rules;
implementation. The state fire council:

(1) May adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary
to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(2) May examine the books, papers, invoices, and
other records of any person in possession, control, or occupancy of any
premises where cigarettes are placed, stored, sold or offered for sale, as well
as the stock of cigarettes on the premises to enforce the provisions of this
chapter, through its duly authorized representatives, or the attorney general
and its duly authorized representatives, or other law enforcement personnel.
Every person in the possession, control, or occupancy of any premises where
cigarettes are placed, sold or offered for sale, shall give the state fire council,
the attorney general, their duly authorized representatives, and other law
enforcement personnel, the means, facilities, and opportunity for the
examinations authorized by this paragraph; and

(3) Shall ensure that the implementation of this
chapter is in accordance with the implementation and substance of the New
York fire safety standards for cigarettes. [L 2008, c 218, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next